Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Chapter 31. Public Improvement Districts
§ 19-31-23.
District authorized to issue bonds, notes, and other evidences of debt; public hearing before issuing bonds or entering into contribution agreement with public entity; notice; investment of monies not immediately needed.

The district may issue and sell from time to time bonds, notes, negotiable notes, tax anticipation notes, bond anticipation notes, other fund anticipation notes, renewal notes, refunding bonds, interim certificates, certificates of indebtedness, certificates of participation, debentures, warrants, commercial paper or other obligations or evidences of indebtedness to provide funds for and to fulfill and achieve its public purpose or corporate purposes, as set forth in this chapter, including, but not limited to, the payment of all or a portion of the costs of a project, to provide amounts necessary for any corporate purposes, including incidental expenses in connection with the issuance of the obligations, the payment of principal and interest on the obligations of the district, the establishment of reserves to secure such obligations, and all other purposes and expenditures of the district incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out its public functions or corporate purposes, and any credit enhancement for such obligations.

Before the issuance of any bonds as authorized under this chapter, the district shall hold a public hearing on the advisability of the indebtedness. Notice of the hearing must be published twice in a newspaper having general circulation in each county where the district is located. The final publication of notice must be at least ten (10) days before the public hearing. The district shall give, by United States first-class mail, written notice of the public hearing to all qualified voters in the district. The notice must be addressed to “Property Owner” and mailed by United States first-class mail to the current address of the owner, as reflected on tax rolls of property located in the district.

If a district proposes to enter into a contribution agreement with a public entity for any bond issue, the public entity shall hold a public hearing on the advisability of the contribution agreement for any bonds the district proposes to enter.

Notice of the hearing must be published twice in a newspaper having general circulation in each county where the public entity is located. The final publication of notice must be at least ten (10) days before the public hearing.

The notice must state the following:

Time and place of the hearing;

General nature of the proposed improvement;

Estimated cost of the improvement;

Boundaries of the public improvement district;

Proposed method of assessment;

Proposed amount and term of indebtedness;

Name of the public entity entering into the contribution agreement; and

Proposed amount of contribution by the public entity.

The hearing may be adjourned from time to time until the governing body of the public entity makes findings by resolution as to the following:

Advisability of the improvement;

Nature of the improvement;

Estimated cost of the improvement;

Boundaries of the public improvement district;

Method of assessment;

Market value of real property within the district determined in accordance with paragraph (c) of this subsection; and

Terms of the contribution agreement.

As provided in subsection (3)(d)(vi) of this section, the governing body of the public entity shall obtain an appraisal in accordance with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice, with special consideration given to the Income Approach to Value using a discounted cash flow analysis of the entire commercial, residential or industrial subdivision. The appraisal must satisfy all parties to the contribution agreement that the value of the property in the district will be sufficient to ensure payment of any obligation to which a public entity is subject.

Except as may otherwise be provided by the district, all obligations issued by the district shall be negotiable instruments and payable solely from the levy of any special assessment by the district or from any other sources whatsoever that may be available to the district but shall not be secured by the full faith and credit of the state or the county or municipality that created the district.

Obligations shall be authorized, issued and sold by a resolution or resolutions of the district adopted as provided in this chapter. Such bonds or obligations may be of such series, bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, including variable, adjustable, or zero interest rates, be payable at such time or times, be in such denominations, be sold at such price or prices, at public or private negotiated sale, after advertisement as is provided for in Section 17-21-53(2) for and in connection with any public sale, be in such form, carry such registration and exchangeability privileges, be payable at such place or places, be subject to such terms of redemption and be entitled to such priorities on the income, revenue and receipts of, or available to, the district as may be provided by the district in the resolution or resolutions providing for the issuance and sale of the bonds or obligations of the district.

The obligations of the district shall be signed by such directors or officers of the district by either manual or facsimile signatures as shall be determined by resolution or resolutions of the district, and shall have impressed or imprinted thereon the seal of the district or a facsimile thereof.

Any obligations of the district may be validly issued, sold and delivered notwithstanding that one or more of the directors or officers of the district signing such obligations or whose facsimile signature or signatures may be on the obligations shall have ceased to be such director or officer of the district at the time such obligations shall actually have been delivered.

Obligations of the district may be sold in such manner and from time to time as may be determined by the district to be most beneficial, and the district may pay all expenses, premiums, fees or commissions that it deems necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance and sale thereof, subject to the provisions of this chapter.

The district may authorize the establishment of a fund or funds for the creation of a debt service reserve, a renewal and replacement reserve or such other funds or reserves as the district may approve with respect to the financing and operation of any project and as may be authorized by any bond resolution, trust agreement, indenture of trust or similar instrument or agreement pursuant to the provisions of which the issuance of bonds or other obligations of the district may be authorized.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, but subject to any agreement with bondholders or noteholders, monies of the district not required for immediate use, including proceeds from the sale of any bonds, notes or other obligations, may be invested in the following:

Obligations of any municipality, the State of Mississippi or the United States of America;

Obligations of which the principal and interest are guaranteed by the State of Mississippi or the United States of America;

Obligations of any corporation wholly owned by the United States of America;

Obligations of any corporation sponsored by the United States of America which are, or may become, eligible as collateral for advances to member banks as determined by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System;

Obligations of insurance firms or other corporations whose investments are rated “A” or better by recognized rating companies;

Certificates of deposit or time deposits of qualified depositories of the State of Mississippi as approved by the State Depository Commission, secured in such manner, if any, as the commission determines appropriate;

Contracts for the purchase and sale of obligations of the type described in paragraphs (a) through (e) of this subsection;

Repurchase agreements secured by obligations described in paragraphs (a) through (e) of this subsection; and

Money market funds, the assets of which are required to be invested in obligations described in paragraphs (a) through (f) of this subsection.

Any cost, obligation or expense incurred for any of the purposes specified in this chapter shall be a part of the project costs and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of the proceeds of bonds or other obligations issued by the district.

Neither the directors of the board nor any person executing the bonds shall be personally liable for the bonds or be subject to any personal liability by reason of the issuance thereof. No earnings or assets of the district shall accrue to the benefit of any private persons. However, the limitation of liability provided for in this subsection shall not apply to any gross negligence or criminal negligence on the part of any director or person executing the bonds.

The district may avail itself of the provisions of Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11.

This chapter constitutes full and complete authority for the issuance of bonds and the exercise of the powers of the district provided herein. No procedures or proceedings, publications, notices, consents, approvals, orders, acts or things by the board or any board, officers, commission, department, agency or instrumentality of the district, other than those required by this chapter, shall be required to perform anything under this chapter, except that the issuance or sale of bonds pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall comply with the general law requirements applicable to the issuance or sale of bonds by the district. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the district to utilize bond proceeds to fund the ongoing operations of the district.

Before incurring any debt as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the district may, but shall not be required to, secure an agreement from one or more developers obligating such developer or developers:

To effect the completion of all or any portion of a project at no cost to the district;

To pay all or any portion of the real property taxes due on the project in a timely manner; and

To maintain and operate all or any portion of the buildings or other facilities or improvements of the project in such a manner as to preserve property values.

No breach of any such agreement shall impose any pecuniary liability upon a district or any charge upon its general credit or against its taxing powers.

Additionally, the district may enter into an agreement with the developer under which the developer may construct all or any part of the project with private funds in advance of issuance of bonds and may be reimbursed by the district for actual costs incurred by the developer upon issuance and delivery of bonds and receipt of the proceeds, conditioned upon dedication of the project by the developer to the district, a governmental agency, a county or a municipality to assure public use and access. This condition shall not apply to the privately owned portion of a project for which the Mississippi Development Authority has issued a certificate of convenience and necessity pursuant to the Regional Economic Development Act.

As used in this section, the term “developer” means any entity or natural person which enters into an agreement with a district whereby the developer agrees to construct, operate and maintain or procure the construction, operation and maintenance of a project or projects, or portions thereof, upon land within the district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 12; Laws, 2007, ch. 405, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 468, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2012.).

§ 19-31-25.
Pledge made by district valid and binding; recording or filing not required for perfection of lien or security interest in pledged property.

Any pledge made by the district shall be valid and binding from time to time when the pledge is made without the need for physical delivery of any pledged property. The money, assets or revenues of the district so pledged and thereafter received by the district shall be immediately subject to the lien of such pledge and shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the district, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded or filed in order to establish and perfect a lien or security interest in the property so pledged by the district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 1, 2002.).

§ 19-31-27.
Creation and operation of district a public and governmental purpose; district exempt from state and local taxes.

It is hereby determined that the creation of the district and the carrying out of its public functions and corporate purposes is, in all respects, a public and governmental purpose for the benefit of the people of the state and for the improvement of their health, safety, welfare, prosperity and security, that such functions and purposes are public purposes and that the district will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the powers conferred upon it by this chapter. All obligations authorized to be issued by the district pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, together with interest thereof, income therefrom, and gain upon the sale thereof shall be exempt from all state and local taxes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 1, 2002.).

§ 19-31-29.
Bonds.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be limited obligations of the district payable solely from the sources pledged for the payment thereof. All such bonds shall contain a statement on their face substantially to the effect that neither the full faith and credit of the state nor the full faith and credit of any governmental unit of the state are pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such bonds. Except as provided in a contribution agreement, the issuance of bonds under the provisions of this chapter shall not directly, indirectly or contingently obligate the state or any governmental unit of the state to levy any taxes or to make any appropriation for their payment arising out of contracts authorized under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 15; Laws, 2012, ch. 468, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2012.).

§ 19-31-31.
Authorization for certain persons to use certain funds for purchase of district-issued obligations.

The state and all public officers, any county, municipality or other subdivision or instrumentality of the state, any political subdivision, any bank, banker, trust company, savings bank and institution, building and loan association, savings and loan association, investment company or any person carrying on a banking or investment business, any insurance company or business, insurance association and any person carrying on an insurance business, any executor, administrator, curator, trustee and other fiduciary, and any retirement system fund may legally invest any sinking funds, monies or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or other obligations issued by the district pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, and such bonds or other obligations shall be authorized security for all public deposits. It is the purpose of this section to authorize such persons, firms, corporations, associations, political subdivisions and officers, or other entities public or private, to use any funds owned or controlled by them, including but not limited to sinking, insurance, investment, retirement, compensation, pension and trust funds, and funds held on deposit, for the purchase of any such bonds or other obligations of the district and that any such bonds shall be authorized security for all public deposits. However, nothing contained in this section with regard to legal investments or security for public deposits shall be construed as relieving any such person, firm, corporation or other entity from any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 1, 2002.).

§ 19-31-33.
Benefit special assessments; maintenance special assessments; levy, collection and enforcement; compensation of tax assessor and collector; installments; prepayment of benefit special assessments.

The board shall annually determine, order and levy the annual installment of the total benefit special assessments for bonds issued and related expenses to finance district facilities and projects that are levied under this chapter. These assessments may be due and collected during each year that county taxes are due and collected, in which case such annual installment and levy shall be evidenced to and certified to the assessor by the board not later than August 31 of each year. Such assessments shall be entered by the assessor on the county tax rolls and shall be collected and enforced by the tax collector in the same manner and at the same time as county taxes, and the proceeds thereof shall be paid to the district. These benefit special assessments shall be a lien on the property against which assessed until paid and shall be collectible and enforceable in like manner as county property taxes. All statutes regulating the collection and enforcement of county property taxes shall apply to the enforcement and collection of the benefit special assessments levied under this section. The amount of the assessment for the exercise of the district’s powers under this chapter shall be determined by the board based upon a report of the district’s engineer and assessed by the board upon such lands, which may be part or all of the lands within the district benefited by the improvement, apportioned between benefited lands in proportion to the benefits received by each tract of land.

To maintain and preserve the facilities and projects of the district, the board shall levy a maintenance special assessment. This assessment may be evidenced by and certified to the assessor by the board of directors not later than August 31 of each year and shall be entered by the assessor on the county tax rolls and shall be collected and enforced by the tax collector in the same manner and at the same time as county taxes, and the proceeds therefrom shall be paid to the district. These maintenance special assessments shall be a lien on the property against which assessed until paid and shall be collectible and enforceable in like manner as county property taxes and all statutes regulating the collection and enforcement of county property taxes shall apply to the enforcement and collection of the benefit special assessments levied under this section. The amount of the maintenance special assessment for the exercise of the district’s powers under this chapter shall be determined by the board based upon a report of the district’s engineer and assessed by the board upon such lands, which may be all of the lands within the district benefited by the maintenance thereof, apportioned between the benefited lands in proportion to the benefits received by each tract of land.

Benefit special assessments and maintenance special assessments authorized by this section shall be levied and payable in annual installments for each year for which bonds secured by the assessment are outstanding. The tax collector shall collect and enforce benefit special assessments and maintenance special assessments in the same manner and at the same time as ad valorem taxes. Benefit special assessments and maintenance special assessments shall constitute a lien on the property against which assessed until paid and shall be on a parity with the lien of state, county, municipal and school board property taxes.

The tax assessor and tax collector are entitled to reasonable compensation for preparing the rolls and collecting the assessments.

District assessments may be made payable in no more than forty (40) yearly installments. Benefit special assessments are prepayable. Any prepayment of benefit special assessments must be credited against the payor’s pro rata share of principal and interest of the indebtedness.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 17; Laws, 2007, ch. 405, § 4; Laws, 2012, ch. 468, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2012.).

§ 19-31-35.
Enforcement of liens.

Any lien in favor of the district arising under this chapter may be enforced by the district in a court of competent jurisdiction as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 18; Laws, 2012, ch. 468, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2012.).

§ 19-31-37.
Compliance with public purchasing provisions of Title 31, Chapter 7.

The district shall comply with the provisions of Section 31-7-1 et seq., regarding the construction of public works or the purchase of materials or supplies.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 1, 2002.).

§ 19-31-39.
Establishment and collection of rates, fees, rentals, or other charges for use of district facilities and services; public hearing; notice.

The district may prescribe, fix, establish and collect rates, fees, rentals or other charges for the facilities and services furnished by the district, within the limits of the district, including, but not limited to, recreational facilities, water management and control facilities and water and sewer systems. The district may also recover the costs of making connection with any district facility or system and provide for reasonable penalties against any user or property for any such rates, fees, rentals or other charges that are delinquent.

No such rates, fees, rentals or other charges for any of the facilities or services of the district may be fixed until after a public hearing at which all the users of the proposed facility or services shall have an opportunity to be heard concerning the proposed rates, fees, rentals or other charges. Notice of such public hearing setting forth the proposed schedule of rates, fees, rentals and other charges shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation in each county where the district is located once at least ten (10) days before such public hearing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 20; Laws, 2012, ch. 468, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2012.).

§ 19-31-41.
Nonpayment, delinquency charges, and discontinuance of service.

The district shall provide by ordinance with respect to nonpayment, delinquency charges and discontinuance of service for water and sewer services provided by the district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 1, 2002.).

§ 19-31-43.
Change in district boundaries; termination or dissolution of district.

The boundaries of the district may be contracted or expanded in the same manner in which the district was created pursuant to this chapter; however, the petition must be filed by the board and must contain the written consent of all landowners within only the proposed area of expansion or contraction.

Subject to the limitations of paragraph (b) of this subsection, the district may be terminated or dissolved in one (1) of the following ways:

The district may be terminated or dissolved upon the transfer of all the public improvement services of the district to a unit of local government. The district shall be terminated in accordance with a plan of termination which shall be adopted by the board of directors and filed with the clerk of the court.

If, within five (5) years after the effective date of the ordinance creating the district, a landowner has not received a development permit on some part or all of the area covered by the district, then the district will be automatically dissolved and a court of competent jurisdiction shall cause a statement to that effect to be filed in the public records.

If the district has become inactive, the county or municipality that created the district shall be informed and shall take appropriate action.

Following the establishment of the district with no timely appeal challenging the district, a district may not be dissolved or terminated if any bonds issued by the district, or bonds for which the district is obligated, are outstanding or are secured by special assessments or other security instruments to which the district is a party in connection with the bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 22; Laws, 2012, ch. 468, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2012.).

§ 19-31-45.
Disclosure statement in contracts and instruments of conveyance of parcels of real property.

After the establishment of a district under this chapter, each contract and instrument of conveyance of a parcel of real property within the district shall include, immediately before the space reserved in the contract and instrument of conveyance for the signature of the purchaser, the following disclosure statement in boldfaced and conspicuous type which is larger than the type in the remaining text of the contract and the instrument of conveyance: “THE (Name of District) PUBLIC IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT MAY IMPOSE AND LEVY ASSESSMENTS ON THIS PROPERTY. THESE ASSESSMENTS PAY THE CONSTRUCTION, OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE COSTS OF CERTAIN PUBLIC FACILITIES AND SERVICES OF THE DISTRICT AND ARE SET ANNUALLY BY THE GOVERNING BOARD OF THE DISTRICT. THESE ASSESSMENTS ARE IN ADDITION TO COUNTY AND OTHER LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL TAXES AND ASSESSMENTS AND ALL OTHER TAXES AND ASSESSMENTS PROVIDED FOR BY LAW.”

However, the failure to include the above language does not and may not be deemed to invalidate any assessment levied by the district or the contract or instrument of conveyance of the real property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 23; Laws, 2012, ch. 468, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2012.).

§ 19-31-47.
Notice of establishment of public improvement district.

Within thirty (30) days after the effective date of the ordinance establishing a public improvement district under this chapter, the district shall cause to be recorded in the sectional index and the subdivisional index, if applicable, in the land records in each county in which it is located a “Notice of Establishment of the_____________________________________Public Improvement District.” The notice shall include the legal description of the district and a copy of the disclosure statement specified in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 24; Laws, 2007, ch. 405, § 5, eff July 2, 2007; Laws, 2012, ch. 468, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 24, 2012.).

§ 19-31-49.
Chapter to be liberally construed.

This chapter, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its residents, shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 25, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 1, 2002.).

§ 19-31-51.
Certificate of public convenience and necessity.

No public improvement district established under this chapter shall provide any utility service described in Section 77-3-3(d) to or for the public for compensation without first obtaining a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the Public Service Commission.

Nothing contained in this section shall prohibit the Public Service Commission from issuing a certificate of public convenience and necessity to any person for service in uncertificated areas within public improvement district boundaries.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, water and/or sewer districts that petition the Public Service Commission for a certificate of public convenience and necessity for any uncertificated area shall give written notice by regular mail to all property owners located in such area, as reflected on the tax rolls of the county or counties at the time of filing the petition, at the address listed on the tax rolls of the county or counties within such area, and to public improvement districts and other public entities located in such area. Such notice shall give the property owners and the governmental entities instructions on how they may appear before the Public Service Commission and make any objections or otherwise participate as an interested party.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 499, § 26; Laws, 2003, ch. 307, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 27, 2003.).